Illinois, session 104th, HB1590.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Civil 5Liability for Unsolicited Intimate Images Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Electronic communication device" means (i) any type of 8instrument, device, machine, equipment, or software that is 9capable of transmitting, acquiring, encrypting, decrypting, or 10receiving any signs, signals, writings, images, and sounds or 11intelligence of any nature by wire, radio, optical, or other 12electromagnetic systems or (ii) any part, accessory, or 13component of such an instrument, device, machine, equipment, 14or software, including, but not limited to, any computer 15circuit, computer chip, security module, smart card, 16electronic mechanism, or other component, accessory, or part, 17that is capable of facilitating the transmission, acquisition, 18encryption, decryption, or reception of signs, signals, 19writings, images, and sounds or intelligence of any nature by 20wire, radio, optical, or other electromagnetic systems.21    "Emotional distress" means mental suffering, anxiety, or 22alarm.23    "Obscene material" means material, including, but not   HB1590 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08224 JRC 18274 b1limited to, images depicting a person engaging in an act of 2sexual intercourse, sodomy, oral copulation, sexual 3penetration, or masturbation, or depicting the exposed 4genitals or anus of any person, taken as a whole, that to the 5average person, applying contemporary statewide standards, 6appeals to the prurient interest, that, taken as a whole, 7depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive 8way, and that, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, 9artistic, political, or scientific value.10    "Reasonable person" means a person in the plaintiff's 11circumstances with the plaintiff's knowledge, or lack of 12knowledge, of the defendant and the defendant's prior acts. 13    Section 10. Unsolicited intimate image liability. Any 14person 18 years of age or older who knowingly and 15intentionally transmits obscene material by computer or other 16electronic means to the computer or electronic communication 17device of another person 18 years of age or older commits a 18trespass and is liable to the recipient of the obscene 19material for actual damages or $500, whichever is greater, in 20addition to reasonable attorney's fees and costs, if the 21person who receives the obscene material has not consented to 22the receipt of the obscene material or has expressly forbidden 23the receipt of the obscene material and if a reasonable person 24who receives the obscene material would suffer emotional 25distress as a result of the receipt of the obscene material.   HB1590 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08224 JRC 18274 b1The court may also enjoin and restrain the defendant from 2committing such further acts.3    The remedies provided by this Act are cumulative and shall 4not be construed as restricting a remedy that is available 5under any other law. 6    Section 15. Application. The provisions of this Act shall 7not apply to (i) any Internet service provider, mobile data 8provider, or operator of an online or mobile application, to 9the extent that such entity is transmitting, routing, or 10providing connections for electronic communications initiated 11by or at the direction of another, (ii) any service that 12transmits material, including an on-demand, subscription, or 13advertising-supported service, (iii) a health care provider 14that transmits material for a legitimate medical purpose, or 15(iv) any transmission of commercial email. 16    Section 20. Venue. Venue for an action under this Act may 17lie in the jurisdiction where the obscene material is 18transmitted from or where the obscene material is received or 19possessed by the plaintiff.